gc_lang/fr/oxt/Dictionnaires/dictionaries/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX yU N 39
SFX yU uire uisant uire
SFX yU uire ui uire
SFX yU uire uis uire
SFX yU uire uit uire
SFX yU uire uisons uire
SFX yU uire uisez uire
SFX yU uire uisent uire
SFX yU uire uisais uire
SFX yU uire uisait uire
SFX yU uire uisions uire
SFX yU uire uisiez uire
SFX yU uire uisaient uire
SFX yU uire uisis uire
SFX yU uire uisit uire
SFX yU uire uisîmes uire
SFX yU uire uisîtes uire
SFX yU uire uisirent uire
SFX yU uire uirai uire
SFX yU uire uiras uire
SFX yU uire uira uire
SFX yU uire uirons uire
SFX yU uire uirez uire
SFX yU uire uiront uire
SFX yU uire uirais uire
SFX yU uire uirait uire
SFX yU uire uirions uire
SFX yU uire uiriez uire
SFX yU uire uiraient uire
SFX yU uire uise uire
SFX yU uire uises uire
SFX yU uire uisisse uire
SFX yU uire uisisses uire
SFX yU uire uisît uire
SFX yU uire uisissions uire
SFX yU uire uisissiez uire
SFX yU uire uisissent uire
SFX yU uire uis uire
SFX yU uire uisons uire
SFX yU uire uisez uire

SFX yV N 44
SFX yV ire isant ire
SFX yV ire it nfire
SFX yV ire its nfire
SFX yV ire ite nfire
SFX yV ire ites nfire
SFX yV ire is cire
SFX yV ire ise cire
SFX yV ire ises cire
SFX yV ire i ffire
SFX yV ire is ire
SFX yV ire it ire
SFX yV ire isons ire
SFX yV ire isez ire
SFX yV ire isent ire
SFX yV ire isais ire
SFX yV ire isait ire
SFX yV ire isions ire
SFX yV ire isiez ire
SFX yV ire isaient ire
SFX yV ire îmes ire
SFX yV ire îtes ire
SFX yV ire irent ire
SFX yV ire irai ire
SFX yV ire iras ire
SFX yV ire ira ire
SFX yV ire irons ire
SFX yV ire irez ire
SFX yV ire iront ire
SFX yV ire irais ire
SFX yV ire irait ire
SFX yV ire irions ire
SFX yV ire iriez ire
SFX yV ire iraient ire
SFX yV ire ise ire
SFX yV ire ises ire
SFX yV ire isse ire
SFX yV ire isses ire
SFX yV ire ît ire
SFX yV ire issions ire
SFX yV ire issiez ire
SFX yV ire issent ire
SFX yV ire is ire
SFX yV ire isons ire
SFX yV ire isez ire

SFX yW N 37
SFX yW ire iant rire
SFX yW ire i rire
SFX yW ire is rire
SFX yW ire it rire
SFX yW ire ions rire
SFX yW ire iez rire
SFX yW ire ient rire
SFX yW ire iais rire
SFX yW ire iait rire
SFX yW ire iions rire
SFX yW ire iiez rire
SFX yW ire iaient rire
SFX yW ire îmes rire
SFX yW ire îtes rire
SFX yW ire irent rire
SFX yW ire irai rire
SFX yW ire iras rire
SFX yW ire ira rire
SFX yW ire irons rire
SFX yW ire irez rire
SFX yW ire iront rire
SFX yW ire irais rire
SFX yW ire irait rire
SFX yW ire irions rire
SFX yW ire iriez rire
SFX yW ire iraient rire
SFX yW ire ie rire
SFX yW ire ies rire
SFX yW ire isse rire
SFX yW ire isses rire
SFX yW ire ît rire
SFX yW ire issions rire
SFX yW ire issiez rire
SFX yW ire issent rire
SFX yW ire is rire
SFX yW ire ions rire
SFX yW ire iez rire

SFX yX Y 30
SFX yX nuire nuire/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisant/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nui nuire
SFX yX nuire nuit/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisons nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisent/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisait/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisiez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisaient/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisit/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisîmes nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisîtes nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisirent/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuira/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirons nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiront/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirait/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiriez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiraient/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuise/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisît/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissiez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissent/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisons-nous nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisez-vous nuire

SFX yY Y 4
SFX yY ccire ccire/n'q'd'l'm't's' occire
SFX yY ccire ccis/L'D'Q' occire
SFX yY ccire ccise/L'D'Q' occire
SFX yY ccire ccises/D'Q' occire

SFX yZ N 13
SFX yZ rire risant rire
SFX yZ rire rit rire
SFX yZ rire rits rire
SFX yZ rire rite rire
SFX yZ rire rites rire
SFX yZ rire ris rire
SFX yZ rire rit rire
SFX yZ rire rirai rire
SFX yZ rire riras rire
SFX yZ rire rira rire
SFX yZ rire rirais rire
SFX yZ rire rirait rire
SFX yZ rire ris rire

SFX q+ Y 36
SFX q+ enir enu/L'D'Q' enir
SFX q+ enir enus/D'Q' enir
SFX q+ enir enue/L'D'Q' enir
SFX q+ enir enues/D'Q' enir
SFX q+ tir ti/L'D'Q' tir
SFX q+ tir tis/D'Q' tir
SFX q+ tir tie/L'D'Q' tir
SFX q+ tir ties/D'Q' tir
SFX q+ courir couru/L'D'Q' courir
SFX q+ courir courus/D'Q' courir
SFX q+ courir courue/L'D'Q' courir
SFX q+ courir courues/D'Q' courir
SFX q+ ivre écu vivre
SFX q+ ivre écus vivre
SFX q+ ivre écue vivre
SFX q+ ivre écues vivre
SFX q+ aire u aire
SFX q+ aire us aire
SFX q+ aire ue aire
SFX q+ aire ues aire
SFX q+ dre du dre
SFX q+ dre dus dre
SFX q+ dre due dre
SFX q+ dre dues dre
SFX q+ valoir valu .valoir
SFX q+ valoir valus .valoir
SFX q+ valoir value .valoir
SFX q+ valoir values .valoir
SFX q+ aître u/L'D'Q' aître
SFX q+ aître us/D'Q' aître
SFX q+ aître ue/L'D'Q' aître
SFX q+ aître ues/D'Q' aître
SFX q+ aitre u/L'D'Q' aitre
SFX q+ aitre us/D'Q' aitre
SFX q+ aitre ue/L'D'Q' aitre
SFX q+ aitre ues/D'Q' aitre

SFX q. Y 9
SFX q. enir enu/q' enir
SFX q. tir ti/q' tir
SFX q. courir couru/q' courir
SFX q. ivre écu vivre
SFX q. aire u aire
SFX q. dre du dre
SFX q. valoir valu/q' .valoir
SFX q. aître u/q' aître
SFX q. aitre u/q' aitre
